District of Columbia statutes.
22-3502

Repealed

“Vagrants” defined.

Repealed.

Dec. 17, 1941, 55 Stat. 808, ch. 589, § 1
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 97, ch. 159, § 209(b)
Nov. 17, 1993, D.C. Law 10-54, § 9, 40 DCR 5450
May 21, 1994, D.C. Law 10-119, § 16(a), 41 DCR 1639
May 17, 1996, D.C. Law 11-119,§ 5, 43 DCR 528
June 3, 1997, D.C. Law 11-275, § 9(a), 44 DCR 1408
Dec. 10, 2009, D.C. Law 18-88, § 216, 56 DCR 7413
1981 Ed., § 22-3302.
1973 Ed., § 22-3302.
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 216 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-181, August 6, 2009, 56 DCR 6903).
For temporary (90 day) repeal, see § 216 of Omnibus Public Safety and Justice Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-227, October 21, 2009, 56 DCR 8668).